Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1142.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4524 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 4524. Windshield obstructions and wipers.* * *(e.1) Vehicle safety inspection.--A motor vehicle which is equipped with tinted windows shall be tested utilizing a window tint meter as part of the motor vehicle safety inspection and shall fail inspection if the motor vehicle violates the provisions of 67 Pa. Code Ch. 175 Subch. O (relating to vehicle sun screening devices) . (e.2) Violation of Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.--Failing to inform a purchaser of window tinting services for a motor vehicle that an alteration or modificatio n 123456789101112131415161718 will cause the motor vehicle to violate the provisions of 67 Pa. Code Ch. 175 Subch. O shall constitute unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices within the meaning of section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions, civil penalties and private rights of action contained in the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1142PN1261 - 2 - 1234567891011